Washington statutes.
RCW 17.34.030

Filing of bylaws and amendments.

Pursuant to Article IV(H) of the compact, copies of bylaws and amendments thereto shall be filed with the code reviser's office.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 130 s 3.]